Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB26.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a)(11)(iv) of the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law, is amended to read:Section 303. Powers and duties of secretary.(a) Powers and duties enumerated.--In addition to the powers and duties provided by law and the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, the secretary shall have the power and it shall be his duty to operate and administer the lottery, and to promulgate rules and regulations governing the establishment and operation thereof, including, but not limited to:123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *(11) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all other sources among:* * *(iv) for property tax relief and free or reduced fare transit service for the elderly as provided in section 311. [The following apply:(A) For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2014, no less than 27% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.(B) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2014, and ending June 30, 2019, no less than 25% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.(C) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2019, and ending June 30, 2029, no less than 20% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.(D) For fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2029, no less than 25% of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be dedicated to this subparagraph.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0026PN0513 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728